Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-488
Districts; reduction in size through acquisition of land by United States; attachment of remainder; apportionment of funds.

When a district is reduced in size by the purchase or appropriation of land by the United States for any defense, flood control, irrigation, or war project, the district to which such remaining part is attached shall receive a pro rata share of all funds based upon the ratio of taxable valuation of the remaining part to the total taxable valuation of the former district as determined at the last current valuation.

Laws 1943, c. 197, § 4, p. 665;

R.S.1943, § 79-128.01;

Laws 1949, c. 256, § 56, p. 711;

Laws 1979, LB 187, § 224;

Laws 1992, LB 719A, § 181;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-417;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 237.